Utah statutes.
48-2e-303.   No liability as limited partner for limited partnership obligations.

(1)  A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership is not the debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partner.  A limited partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited partnership solely by reason of being or acting as a limited partner, even if the limited partner participates in the management and control of the limited partnership.

(2)  The failure of a limited partnership to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on a limited partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

